en: Stump Shrinkers
xx: Stump Shrinkers
cs: Pahýlové návleky
da: Støttebind til amputerede lemmer
de: Amputationsstrümpfe
es: Artículos de compresión para muñones
fr: Réducteurs de moignon
it: Bende per arti amputati
ja: スタンプシュリンカー
nl: Stompkousen
no: Støttestrømper og støttebind
pl: Opaski uciskowe na kikuty
pt: Ataduras elásticas para amputados
ru: Компрессионные чехлы для культей
sv: Bindor för formlindning av amputationsstumpar
tr: Protez Çorapları

en: Supports & Braces
xx: Supports & Braces
cs: Bandáže a ortézy
da: Støtter og skinner
de: Stützen & Bandagen
es: Artículos ortopédicos y de soporte
fr: Accessoires de maintien et attelles
it: Sostegni e tutori
ja: サポーター・固定装具
nl: Orthopedische hulpmiddelen
no: Støtter og oppstrammere
pl: Usztywniacze ortopedyczne i stabilizatory
pt: Suportes e aparelhos ortodônticos
ru: Опоры и фиксаторы
sv: Ortoser och stödbandage
tr: Destek ve Bilezikler

en: Surgical Lubricants
xx: Surgical Lubricants
cs: Chirurgické lubrikanty
da: Cremer til operationer
de: Medizinisches Gleitgel
es: Lubricantes quirúrgicos
fr: Lubrifiants chirurgicaux
it: Lubrificanti chirurgici
ja: 医療用潤滑剤
nl: Chirurgische smeermiddelen
no: Kirurgiske smøremidler
pl: Lubrykanty chirurgiczne
pt: Lubrificantes cirúrgicos
ru: Хирургические смазки
sv: Kirurgiska glidmedel
tr: Ameliyat Sonrası Bakım Kremleri

en: Jewelry Cleaning & Care
xx: Jewelry Cleaning & Care
cs: Čištění a péče o šperky
da: Smykkerens og pleje
de: Schmuckreinigung & -pflege
es: Limpieza y cuidado de joyas
fr: Entretien et nettoyage des bijoux
it: Pulizia e cura dei gioielli
ja: ジュエリーお手入れ用品
nl: Reiniging en onderhoud van sieraden
no: Smykkerens og -behandling
pl: Czyszczenie i pielęgnacja biżuterii
pt: Limpeza e cuidado de jóias
ru: Средства для ухода за ювелирными изделиями
sv: Smyckesvård och smyckesrengöring
tr: Mücevher Temizlik ve Bakımı

en: Jewelry Cleaning Solutions & Polishes
xx: Jewelry Cleaning Solutions & Polishes
cs: Roztoky a leštidla na čištění šperků
da: Rense- og pudsevæsker til smykker
de: Lösungen und Poliermittel zur Schmuckreinigung
es: Soluciones y pulidos para joyas
fr: Cirages et solutions de nettoyage pour bijoux
it: Detergenti e soluzioni per la pulizia di gioielli
ja: ジュエリー洗浄液/ポリッシュ
nl: Reinigings- en polijstvloeistoffen voor sieraden
no: Rengjøringsmidler til smykker
pl: Środki czyszczące i polerujące do biżuterii
pt: Produtos para limpeza e polimento de joias
ru: Средства для чистки и полировки ювелирных изделий
sv: Smyckesrengöringsmedel
tr: Mücevher Temizleme Ürünleri ve Parlatıcılar

en: Jewelry Cleaning Tools
xx: Jewelry Cleaning Tools
cs: Nástroje na čištění šperků
da: Værktøj til rensning af smykker
de: Hilfsmittel zur Schmuckreinigung
es: Artículos para la limpieza de joyas
fr: Outils de nettoyage pour bijoux
it: Strumenti per la pulizia di gioielli
ja: ジュエリー洗浄用品
nl: Reinigers voor sieraden
no: Rengjøringsverktøy til smykker
pl: Narzędzia do czyszczenia biżuterii
pt: Ferramentas para limpeza de joias
ru: Приспособления для чистки ювелирных изделий
sv: Verktyg för smyckesrengöring
tr: Mücevher Temizleme Araçları

en: Jewelry Holders
xx: Jewelry Holders
cs: Skříňky a stojany na šperky
da: Smykkeholdere
de: Schmuckständer & -kästen
es: Soportes para joyería
fr: Présentoirs à bijoux, Boîte à bijoux, Écrin à bijoux, Ecrin à bijoux
it: Portagioie
ja: ジュエリーボックス・ジュエリースタンド
nl: Sieradenhouders
no: Smykkeholdere
pl: Przechowywanie biżuterii
pt: Porta-jóias
ru: Коробки для ювелирных украшений
sv: Smyckesställ
tr: Mücevher Kutuları

en: Jewelry Steam Cleaners
xx: Jewelry Steam Cleaners
cs: Parní čističky na šperky
da: Smykkedamprensere
de: Dampfstrahlreiniger für Schmuck
es: Vaporizadores para joyas
fr: Nettoyeurs à vapeur pour bijoux
it: Detergenti a vapore per gioielli
ja: ジュエリー スチーム クリーナー
nl: Stoomreinigers voor sieraden
no: Damprensere til smykker
pl: Urządzenia parowe do czyszczenia biżuterii
pt: Limpadores a vapor para joias
ru: Пароочистители для ювелирных изделий
sv: Ångrengöring för smycken
tr: Buharlı Mücevher Temizleyiciler

en: Watch Repair Kits
xx: Watch Repair Kits
cs: Hodinářské sady
da: Reparationssæt til ure
de: Uhrreparatursätze
es: Kits de reparación de relojes
fr: Kits de réparation pour montres
it: Kit riparazione orologi
ja: 時計修理キット
nl: Reparatiekits voor horloge
no: Urmakersett
pl: Zestawy do naprawy zegarków
pt: Kits para conserto de relógios
ru: Комплекты для ремонта часов
sv: Reparationskit för armbandsur
tr: Kol Saati Tamir Setleri

en: Personal Care
xx: Personal Care
cs: Osobní péče
da: Personlig pleje
de: Körperpflege
es: Cuidado personal
fr: Hygiène personnelle
it: Cura della persona
ja: 衛生日用品
nl: Persoonlijke verzorging
no: Personlig pleie
pl: Higiena osobista
pt: Cuidados pessoais
ru: Личная гигиена
sv: Personlig vård
tr: Kişisel Bakım

en: Back Care
xx: Back Care
cs: Péče o záda
da: Rygpleje
de: Rückengesundheit
es: Cuidado de la espalda
fr: Soin du dos
it: Mal di schiena
ja: 腰痛対策グッズ
nl: Rugzorg
no: Ryggpleie
pl: Pielęgnacja pleców
pt: Cuidados com as costas
ru: Средства для ухода за спиной
sv: Ryggvård
tr: Sırt Bakımı

en: Back & Lumbar Support Cushions
xx: Back & Lumbar Support Cushions
cs: Bederní a zádové opěrky
da: Støttepuder til lænd og ryg
de: Stützkissen für Rücken- & Lendenbereich
es: Cojines de soporte lumbar y de espalda
fr: Coussins de soutien lombaire et dorsal
it: Cuscini di supporto lombari e per schiena
ja: 背中・腰用サポートクッション
nl: Ondersteuningskussens voor rug en lendenen
no: Støtteputer for rygg og korsrygg
pl: Poduszki pod plecy i lędźwie
pt: Almofadas de apoio para costas e lombar
ru: Подушки для поддержки спины и поясницы
sv: Stödkuddar för rygg och ländrygg
tr: Sırt ve Bel Yastıkları

en: Bath & Body
xx: Bath & Body
cs: Koupele a péče o tělo
da: Bad og krop
de: Badeartikel
es: Baño y cuidado corporal
fr: Bain et corps
it: Bagno e corpo
ja: バス・ボディケア用品
nl: Bad en lichaam
no: Bad og kropp
pl: Akcesoria i kosmetyki do kąpieli
pt: Banho e corpo
ru: Средства для ванны и душа
sv: Bad och kropp
tr: Banyo ve Vücut

en: Adult Hygienic Wipes
xx: Adult Hygienic Wipes
cs: Hygienické ubrousky
da: Vådservietter til voksne
de: Feuchttücher für Erwachsene
es: Toallitas higiénicas para adultos
fr: Lingettes hygiéniques pour adultes
it: Salviettine igieniche per adulti
ja: 大人用除菌ウェットティッシュ
nl: Vochtige reinigingsdoekjes voor volwassenen
no: Våtservietter for voksne
pl: Nawilżane chusteczki dla dorosłych
pt: Lenços umedecidos para adultos
ru: Гигиенические салфетки для взрослых
sv: Våtservetter för intimhygien
tr: Yetişkin Hijyenik Mendilleri

en: Bar Soap
xx: Bar Soap
cs: Kusové mýdlo
da: Stangsæbe
de: Seife
es: Pastilla de jabón
fr: Savon
it: Saponetta
ja: 石鹸
nl: Stuk zeep
no: Såpestykker
pl: Mydła w kostce
pt: Sabonete
ru: Кусковое мыло
sv: Tvål
tr: Kalıp Sabun

en: Bath Additives
xx: Bath Additives
cs: Koupelové oleje a soli
da: Badesæber\, -olier og -salt
de: Schaumbäder & Badesalze
es: Sales de baño y baño de burbujas
fr: Sels de bain et produits moussants
it: Bagnoschiuma e sali da bagno
ja: 入浴剤
nl: Bubbelbad en badzout
no: Badetilsetninger
pl: Dodatki do kąpieli
pt: Sais de banho e banho de espuma
ru: Пены и соли для ванны
sv: Badtillsatser
tr: Banyo Katkı Maddeleri

en: Bath Brushes
xx: Bath Brushes
cs: Koupelové kartáče
da: Badebørster
de: Badebürsten
es: Cepillos para el baño
fr: Brosses de bain
it: Spazzole da bagno
ja: ボディブラシ
nl: Badborstels
no: Badekoster
pl: Szczotki do kąpieli
pt: Escovas de banho
ru: Щётки для душа
sv: Badborstar
tr: Banyo Fırçaları

en: Bath Sponges & Loofahs
xx: Bath Sponges & Loofahs
cs: Mycí houby a žínky
da: Badesvampe og frottesvampe
de: Bade- & Naturschwämme
es: Esponjas de baño y lufas exfoliantes
fr: Loofahs et exfoliants
it: Spugne esfolianti
ja: ボディスポンジ・ヘチマ
nl: Sponzen en douchescrubs
no: Badesvamper og frotterhansker
pl: Gąbki i myjki do ciała
pt: Esponjas e escovas de banho
ru: Губки и мочалки для душа
sv: Tvättsvampar och tvättgurkor
tr: Banyo Sünger ve Lifleri

en: Body Wash
xx: Body Wash
cs: Tělová mýdla
da: Kropsshampoo
de: Waschlotion
es: Gel de ducha
fr: Nettoyants pour le corps
it: Bagni schiuma
ja: ボディソープ
nl: Bodywash
no: Kroppsvask
pl: Żele pod prysznic
pt: Sabonetes para o corpo
ru: Составы для мытья тела
sv: Duschkräm
tr: Vücut Şampuanları

en: Hand Sanitizers & Wipes
xx: Hand Sanitizers & Wipes
cs: Mýdlo na ruce
da: Håndrens
de: Handdesinfektionsmittel
es: Desinfectantes para manos
fr: Gel antibactérien pour les mains
it: Igienizzanti per mani
ja: 手指消毒剤
nl: Handreinigers
no: Håndrens
pl: Mydła dezynfekujące do rąk
pt: Desinfetante de mãos
ru: Антибактериальные гели для рук
sv: Handsprit
tr: El Antiseptikleri